Utah statutes.
70A-4a-108.   Exclusion of consumer transactions governed by federal law.
This chapter does not apply to a funds transfer any part of which is governed
by the Electronic Fund Transfer Act of 1978, Title XX, Public Law 95-630, 92
Stat.  3728, 15 U.S.C.  Section 1693 et seq., as amended.
